src-fst-morphology-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# Moirfeolaíocht na nAinmfhocail Gaeilge (Morphology of Irish Nouns)
E. Uí Dhonnchadha 
January 2001 
April 2003:  ^IM general initial mutation flag
REFERENCES 
- (1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers   
- (2) Gramadach na Gaeilge agus Litriú na Gaeilge - An Caighdeán Oifigiúil 
- (3) Foclóir Póca - An Gúm 
- (4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí 
- (5) Gléacht & Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary 
GENERAL NOTES
0.	Alphabet : a b c d e f g h i l m n o p r s t u + á é í ó ú.
1.	There are three principal cases : Nominative, Genitive and Vocative
2.	Nouns are inflected for number, gender and case. They can be inflected at 
2.1	Gender.
	After the definite article "an" 
In the case of an initial "s", a "t" will be placed before it 
	(b) Masculine nouns will have "t-" inserted before an initial vowel.
2.2	Vowel Harmony must be maintained within words ie a word must be Broad or Slender 
3.	Number.
	1st. Declension - All Masculine - nouns all end in broad consonant
	2nd. Declension - All Feminine -  nouns end in broad or slender consonant
	3rd. Declension - Feminine & Masculine - nouns end in a broad or slender consonant.
	4th. Declension - Feminine & Masculine - all end in a vowel or "ín"
-  **LEXICON Nouns** 
##					1st DECLENSION 
(1) WEAK PLURALS 
Nom												
	an cat (the cat)				na cait	(the cats)		}
	an suipéar (the supper)			na suipéir (the suppers)}
Gen
	ceol an éin (the birds's song)	ceol na n-éan (the birds' song)	
	am an suipéir (the supper's time) an na suipéar (the suppers' time)
Voc
	

-  **airgeadas Nm1-SINGULAR;** 
-  **áireamh Nm1-SINGULAR;** 
-  **amhras Nm1-SINGULAR;** 
-  **aonar Nm1-SINGULAR;** 
etc. 

(2) WEAK PLURALS
EXAMPLE:
Nom	
Gen	
Voc	
	

-  **bruas Nm1-2;**  (thick) lip 
-  **cág Nm1-2;**  jackdaw 
-  **ceart Nm1-2;**  right
-  **cor Nm1-2;** 
-  **fionn Nm1-2;**  fair, white
-  **gnáth Nm1-2;** 
-  **íol Nm1-2;**  idol 

(3) STRONG PLURALS - ADD "TA"
	LONG VOWEL (áéíóú ao ae o[mh] u[mh] i[á|ó] u[á|ó] a[rd|rl|rn|rr])

-  **ál Nm1-3;**  clutch, brood
-  **aon Nm1-3;**  one, ace 
etc.

(4) STRONG PLURALS - ADD "THA"
-  **glór Nm1-4;**  voice
-  **múr Nm1-4;**  wall, shower

(5) STRONG PLURALS - ADD (A)Í

-  **bealach Nm1-5;**  way, road
-  **cogadh Nm1-5;** 
-  **Domhnach Nm1-5;**  Sunday
etc

(6) STRONG PLURALS - ADD  "ANNA"

-  **bás Nm1-6;** 

(7) STRONG PLURALS - ADD "Í"

(8) STRONG PLURALS - SYNCOPATE + ADD "ANNA"

(9) STRONG PLURALS - SYNCOPATE, ATTENUATE + ADD "E"

(10) STRONG PLURALS - SYNCOPATE + ADD "EACHA"

			1 MASC.
		list the categories here ......

-  **baint Nf2-SINGULAR;** 
-  **réir Nf2-SINGULAR;** 
-  **spéis Nf2-SINGULAR;** 
-  **suim Nf2-SINGULAR;** 
-  **teilifís Nf2-SINGULAR;** 
-  **titim Nf2-SINGULAR;** 

(1) WEAK PLURALS (no longer used)
(2) WEAK PLURALS (ie Nom, Gen & Voc plurals are not the same)
ONE SYLLABLE - Broad/Slender
-  **binn Nf2-2;**  peak		
-  **cliath Nf2-2;** 
-  **deoir Nf2-2;**  tear

(3) WEAK PLURALS 

- (4) WEAK PLURALS 
- 	MORE THAN ONE SYLLABLE, 
- 	ENDS IN (E)ACH WHICH CHANGES TO (A)Í IN GEN. SG. (USES ^ATH TAG & D4)
- 	
- 	Nom Pl : Append "a"		(PL-3)
- 	Gen Pl : No change		(PL-0)
- 	Voc Pl : Append "a"		(PL-3)

(5) STRONG PLURALS - ADD "TE"

(7) STRONG PLURALS - ADD "Í"
more than one syllable - SLENDER

BROAD & SLENDER
(8) STRONG PLURALS - ADD -(E)ACHA

) STRONG PLURALS - ADD "THA"

3 Masculine words in 2nd Declension 

##					3rd DECLENSION 

3rd declension FEMININE NOUNS 
-  **coinneáil Nf3-SINGULAR;** 
-  **éisteacht Nf3-SINGULAR;** 
-  **imirt Nf3-4;**  -SINGULAR;

3rd declension MASCULINE NOUNS 

##					4th DECLENSION 

##					5th DECLENSION 

###                   5th Declension MASCULINE NOUNS 

=======================end of 5th declension==========================!

-  **LEXICON NounsB** 

-  **LEXICON NounsC** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>
